Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 13. Donations of Food

§ 35-7-1301.
Donation of food; exemption from civil liability.

No person who donates food to a nonprofit organization for use or distribution in providing assistance shall be liable for damages in any civil action resulting from the nature, age, condition or packaging of the donated food except that the exemption does not apply to the willful, wanton or reckless acts of donors which result in injury to recipients of the donated food. For the purposes of this section, “nonprofit organization” includes any corporation organized under W.S.

17-19-101

through

17-19-1807

and does not include organizations which sell or offer to sell donated food.

Any nonprofit organization, which serves or provides food to persons for their consumption as described in subsection (a) of this section, is liable for any injury resulting from the ingesting of the donated food received, accepted, gathered or removed by that organization, only if that injury is caused by a willful, wanton or reckless act of the organization.

Any nonprofit organization that receives any donated food pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not sell or offer to sell the donated food.

Nothing in this section is intended to restrict the authority of any appropriate agency to regulate or ban the use of donated food for human consumption.

History.

Laws 1981, ch. 7, § 1; 1985, ch. 98, § 1; 1992, ch. 53, § 2.

§ 35-7-1302.
Donation of game animals.

Any game animal, including any big game animal, elk, deer, mountain sheep, wild goat, antelope, moose or bear, lawfully taken by a licensed hunter may be donated to a nonprofit organization under the provisions of W.S.

35-7-1301

to feed individuals in need.

Any donated big game meat shall be subject to the following:

Come from an animal in apparent good health prior to slaughter;

Come from an animal with intact intestines;

Be field-dressed immediately after slaughter and be handled in a manner in keeping with generally accepted wild game handling procedures;

Be processed as soon as possible after slaughter by a custom meat processor or custom game processor;

Be clearly marked as “not for sale”;

Be clearly marked as “donated game meat” in letters not less than three-eights (3/8) of an inch in height;

Shall not come from any road-kill animal and any road-kill animal shall not be eligible for donation under this section.

Any organization receiving donated game meat shall be advised by the donor or meat processor that the meat should be thoroughly cooked prior to human consumption. Prior to serving any donated game meat, the nonprofit organization shall prominently post a sign indicating the meat is donated game meat, the type of meat processing used, and that the meat has not been inspected.

Any game animal in the possession of the Wyoming game and fish department may be donated if the provisions of this section are followed.

No donated game meat shall be bought, sold or offered for sale or barter by any person.

The department of agriculture shall have authority to examine, sample, seize or condemn any donated game meat if the department has reason to believe the meat is unwholesome under the Wyoming Food, Drug and Cosmetic Safety Act, W.S.

35-7-109

et seq.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 53, § 1; 2000, ch. 37, § 3.